Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 25 Physical Therapists

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to chiropractors, see chapter 10 of this title.

As to nurses, see chapter 21 of this title.

For the Wyoming Pharmacy Act, see chapter 24 of this title.

As to physicians and surgeons, see chapter 26 of this title.

As to eye care practitioners, see chapter 32 of this title.

Stated

in

Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 33-25-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Physical therapy” or “physiotherapy” means the care and services provided by or under the direction and supervision of a physical therapist or physiotherapist who is licensed pursuant to this act. The practice of physical therapy includes:

Examining, evaluating and testing persons with mechanical, physiological or developmental impairments, functional limitations, disabilities or other health or movement related conditions to determine a physical therapy diagnosis, prognosis or plan of treatment and assessing the ongoing effects of intervention;

Alleviating impairments, functional limitations or disabilities by designing, implementing or modifying treatment interventions that may include but are not limited to:

Therapeutic exercise;

Functional activities in the home;

Community or work integration or reintegration;

Manual therapy, which includes mobilization and grades I through IV manipulation of joints and soft tissue but does not include grade V manipulations without completion of advanced training requirements as determined by the board;

Therapeutic massage;

Prescription, application or fabrication of appropriate assistive, adaptive, protective or supportive devices or equipment;

Airway clearance techniques;

Integumentary protection or repair techniques;

Wound care;

Application of physical agents or modalities;

Mechanical modalities;

Patient related instruction.

Reducing the risk of injury, impairment, functional limitation or disability, including the promotion and maintenance of fitness, health and wellness.

“Physical therapist” or “physiotherapist” means a person who is licensed to practice physical therapy pursuant to this act;

“Board” means the Wyoming board of physical therapy as established under the provisions of this act;

“Applicant” means any individual who submits a completed application to the board for issuance of a physical therapist license or a physical therapist assistant certificate;

“Physical therapist assistant” means an individual who is certified pursuant to this act and who assists a licensed physical therapist in lawfully delegated components of physical therapy subject to the provisions of this act and rules and regulations of the board;

“Physical therapy services” means the care and services provided by a licensed physical therapist or a certified physical therapist assistant pursuant to this act;

“Consultation using telecommunication” means the provision of professional or expert opinion or advice to a physical therapist or other health care provider using telecommunication or computer technology from a distant location. It includes the review or transfer of patient records or related information using audio, video or data communications;

“Jurisdiction” means the states, districts, territories or possessions of the United States;

“On site supervision” means the supervising physical therapist or physical therapist assistant is continuously present in the facility where the supervised services are provided, is immediately available to the person being supervised and maintains continued involvement in each treatment session;

“Physical therapy aide” means a person trained under the direction of a licensed physical therapist who performs designated and supervised components of care related to physical therapy;

“Physical therapy diagnosis” means a systematic examination process that culminates in assigning a diagnostic label identifying the primary dysfunction towards which physical therapy treatment will be directed, but shall not include a medical diagnosis or a diagnosis of disease;

“This act” means W.S.

33-25-101

through

33-25-116

.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-326.1; Laws 1985, ch. 216, § 2; 2009, ch. 134, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(i), inserted “or ‘physiotherapy’ ” following “ ‘Physical therapy’ ” and substituted “the care and services provided by or under the direction and supervision of a physical therapist or physiotherapist who is licensed pursuant to this act.
The practice of physical therapy includes” for the evaluation, instruction or treatment of a human being to prevent, correct, alleviate or limit physical disability due to injury, disease or any other physical or mental condition by the utilization of physical measures such as exercise, massage, heat, cold, air, light, water, electricity or sound, and rehabilitative procedures including training in functional activities and the performance and interpretation of tests and measurements of bodily functions as an aid in the examination, evaluation or treatment of any human conditions for the purpose of correcting or alleviating an individual's physical or mental disability. Physical therapy also includes the supervision of physical therapy activities, physical therapy consultation and the establishment and modification of physical therapy programs, but physical therapy shall not include radiology or electro-surgery or authorize the diagnosis of disease. Treatment by physical therapy shall be rendered subject to W.S.

33-25-102

”; added (a)(i)(A) through (a)(i)(C); in (a)(ii), added
“or ‘physiotherapist’ ” following “ ‘Physical therapist’ ”; rewrote (a)(iv), which read: “ ‘Applicant’ means any individual who has applied to the board for licensure as a physical therapist or registration as a physical therapist assistant and whose application is pending, awaiting decision by the board”; in (a)(v), inserted “is certified pursuant to this act and who” following “an individual who”, inserted “in lawfully delegated components of physical therapy” following “licensed physical therapist”, and substituted “rules and regulations of the board” for “rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, and who has met all the requirements of this act”; in (a)(vi), inserted “the care and” preceding “services”, inserted “licensed” preceding “physical therapist”, inserted “certified” preceding “physical therapist assistant”, and deleted “licensed” preceding “pursuant to this act”; added (a)(vii) through (a)(xi) and redesignated the remaining paragraph accordingly; and in (a)(xii), substituted “33-25-116” for “33-25-115.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-25-102.
Practice of physical therapy; license or certificate required; exceptions; false representations.

No individual shall engage in the practice of physical therapy services nor hold himself out as being able to practice physical therapy in the state of Wyoming unless he is licensed or certified in accordance with the provisions of this act and such license or certificate is in good standing and has not been suspended or revoked, except nothing in this act shall:

Prohibit any individual licensed in Wyoming under any other act from engaging in the practice for which he is licensed;

Prohibit students who are enrolled in educational courses of physical therapy at schools recognized by the board from performing acts of physical therapy incidental to their respective courses of study while under the direct supervision of a licensed physical therapist who is in compliance with subsection (c) of this section;

Apply to any individual employed by an agency, bureau or division of the federal government while in the discharge of official duties;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 165, § 2.

No individual or business entity shall use in connection with his name or business, the words physical therapy, physical therapist, physiotherapy, physiotherapist, registered physical therapist, licensed physical therapist, doctor of physical therapy or the letters P.T., L.P.T., R.P.T., D.P.T., M.P.T., M.S.P.T. or any other words, letters, abbreviations or insignia indicating or implying directly or indirectly that physical therapy is provided or supplied in any manner unless the person is a physical therapist licensed to practice in accordance with this act. No individual or business entity shall use the title physical therapist assistant, the letters P.T.A. or any other words, abbreviations or insignia in connection with his name to indicate or imply that the person is a physical therapist assistant unless the person is certified as a physical therapist assistant in accordance with this act.

A physical therapist may initiate physical therapy with or without a prescription from a licensed physician or other health care provider, except that a physical therapist shall refer a patient or client to another health care provider to diagnose or care for the patient or client if the physical therapist reasonably believes that symptoms or conditions may be present that require health care services beyond the scope of physical therapy practice, or physical therapy is contraindicated.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 12, § 2.

Physical therapy aides may perform patient care activities as defined by the board under the on-site supervision of a licensed physical therapist or a certified physical therapist assistant.

Prior to any physical therapy service, the patient or client shall be directed to posted information and delivered a handout explaining:

The education level and degrees held by the treating physical therapist;

That coverage may not be available through governmental or worker’s compensation programs unless prescribed by a physician, physician’s assistant, dentist, chiropractor, podiatrist or nurse practitioner; and

That the patient’s or client’s insurance may not cover the service.

The following persons are exempt from the licensure and certification requirements of this act:

A person in a professional education program approved by the board who is satisfying supervised clinical education requirements related to the person’s physical therapist education while under on-site supervision of a licensed physical therapist;

A physical therapist who is practicing exclusively through the United States armed services, public health service or veterans administration;

A physical therapist licensed to practice physical therapy in another jurisdiction while teaching, demonstrating, providing physical therapy in connection with teaching or participating in an educational seminar in Wyoming. An exemption under this paragraph shall not exceed sixty (60) days cumulatively in a calendar year;

A physical therapist licensed in another jurisdiction who provides consultation using telecommunication;

A physical therapist licensed in another jurisdiction or credentialed in another country who provides therapy to individuals affiliated with or employed by established athletic teams, athletic organizations or performing arts companies temporarily practicing, competing or performing in the state. An exemption under this paragraph shall not exceed sixty (60) days cumulatively in a calendar year;

A physical therapist licensed in another jurisdiction who enters this state to provide physical therapy during a public health emergency as declared by the governor pursuant to W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i). Any physical therapist practicing pursuant to this paragraph shall notify the board of the therapist’s intent to practice and supply additional information as provided by rules of the board;

A physical therapist licensed in another jurisdiction who is forced to leave his residence or place of employment due to a declared local, state or national disaster or emergency and who seeks to practice physical therapy in Wyoming. An exemption under this paragraph shall be limited to sixty (60) days following the declaration of disaster or emergency. Any physical therapist practicing pursuant to this paragraph shall notify the board of the therapist’s intent to practice and supply additional information as provided by rules of the board.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-326.2; Laws 1985, ch. 216, § 2; 1997, ch. 117, § 1; 1999, ch. 195, § 1; 2003, ch. 29, § 1; ch. 111, § 1; 2009, ch. 134, § 2; ch. 165, § 2; 2019 ch. 12, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 134, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, in (a), deleted “From and after January 1, 1962” from the beginning, substituted “engage in the practice of physical therapy” for “provide physical therapy”, inserted “or certified” following “licensed”, and inserted “or certificate” following “license”; in (b), in the first sentence, substituted “No individual or business entity” for “No person”, inserted “licensed physical therapist, doctor of physical therapy” following “registered physical therapist”, inserted “D.P.T., M.P.T., M.S.P.T” following “R.P.T.”, substituted “unless the person is a physical therapist” for “when the person is not a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant”, and added the second sentence; in (c), in the third sentence, substituted “Except in an emergency, a physical therapist, without a prescription” for “Without a prescription, a physical therapist”; in (d), substituted “Physical therapy aides” for “Assistive personnel” and substituted “certified physical therapist assistant” for “registered physical therapist assistant”; in (e)(ii), inserted “dentist, chiropractor, podiatrist” preceding “or nurse practitioner”; and added (f).

The second 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 165, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, repealed (a)(iv), which read: “Prohibit an athletic trainer certified by a national athletic trainers' certification organization approved by the board from providing athletic training services to participating athletes of an educational institution or a professional or bona fide amateur sports organization at the institution or organization's athletic training facility or at the site of athletic practice or competition, provided that no person shall use in connection with his name or activity the words ‘athletic trainer’ or ‘athletic training’ or the letters ‘AT’ or ‘ATC’ unless the person is certified as provided by this paragraph.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2019,
in (c) substituted “A” for “Except as provided in this subsection,” deleted “with a master's degree, or a bachelor's degree with five (5) years of clinical experience” and “treatment for a new or recurring injury” and substituted “or other health care provider, except that a physical therapist shall refer a patient or client to another health care provider to diagnose or care for the patient or client if the physical therapist reasonably believes that symptoms or conditions may be present that require health care services beyond the scope of physical therapy practice, or physical therapy is contraindicated” for “including doctor of osteopathy, podiatrist, advanced practitioner of nursing, dentist, chiropractor or physician assistant. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preclude a physical therapist from treating a chronic or recurring injury or condition without a prescription, provided that the patient or client was previously diagnosed and prescribed physical therapy treatment within the previous year by a health care provider identified in this subsection and the treatment is directly related to the original prescribed care. Except in an emergency, a physical therapist, without a prescription, is prohibited from initiating physical therapy treatment for children under the age of twelve (12) years, unless the child is to receive physical therapy treatment under an individualized education program or an individualized family services plan. A physical therapist shall refer the patient or client to a licensed physician including doctor of osteopathy, podiatrist, advanced practitioner of nursing, dentist, chiropractor or physician assistant, as appropriate, when.”

Laws 2019, ch. 12, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 12, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (c)(i) through (c)(iii) which read: “(i) The physical therapist has reasonable cause to believe symptoms or conditions are present that require services beyond the scope of physical therapy practice; (ii) Physical therapy is contradicated; or (iii) Except for patients or clients participating in general exercise or fitness programs or receiving physical therapy services under an individualized education program or an individualized family services plan, the patient or client has received physical therapy services without a prescription for twelve (12) visits or for a thirty (30) day period, whichever occurs earlier, and further services may be necessary.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Laws 2019, ch. 12, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-25-101(a)(xii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Licensing and regulation of practice of physical therapy, 8 ALR5th 825.

§ 33-25-103.
Board of physical therapy; established; members; terms; removal; compensation.

There is established the Wyoming board of physical therapy which shall consist of three (3) physical therapists licensed pursuant to this act, one (1) public representative and one (1) medical doctor, appointed as follows:

The physical therapist members shall be appointed by the governor. All shall be residents of Wyoming, possess unrestricted licenses to practice physical therapy in this state and have been practicing in this state for not less than three (3) years before appointment;

A medical doctor shall be appointed to the board by the governor. The medical doctor shall be a practicing physician who has practiced in Wyoming for a period of at least five (5) years immediately preceding the appointment;

The public member shall be appointed by the governor, shall be a resident of Wyoming and shall have resided in the state for not less than three (3) years.

Terms of office for board members shall be for four (4) years, except that the expiring term of a member shall continue until a successor member has been appointed. Board members shall serve no more than two (2) consecutive terms. The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

Members of the board shall each receive from the physical therapy account compensation at the salary rate provided in W.S. 28-5-101(d) for each day actually spent in the performance of their board duties along with per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii). Board members shall serve without compensation where there are insufficient monies in the account to pay the compensation.

Vacancies on the board shall be filled in a like manner as are the original appointments, to complete the unexpired term left vacant.

The members shall annually select a president and secretary who shall each serve a one (1) year term of office from the date of election.

The board shall meet at least twice annually and at such other times as the board deems necessary. Action by the board shall be by majority vote. Three (3) members constitute a quorum.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 33-326.3; Laws 1971, ch. 172, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 179, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1985, ch. 216, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2009, ch. 134, § 2; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(i), deleted “from a list of five (5) qualified physical therapists submitted by the Wyoming chapter of American Physical Therapy Association” from the end of the first sentence, substituted “possess unrestricted licenses to practice physical therapy in this state and have been practicing in this state for not less than three (3) years before appointment” for “and practitioners of physical therapy” in the second sentence, and deleted the third sentence, which read: “They shall meet all requirements established by the American Physical Therapy Association for registry of members and shall have practiced a minimum of three (3) years in Wyoming”; in (a)(ii), deleted “from a list of five (5) medical doctors, recommended on the basis of interest in physical therapy, by the Wyoming chapter of the American Physical Therapy Association” from the end of the first sentence, and substituted “The medical doctor shall be a practicing physician who has practiced” for “Those recommended shall be practicing physicians who have practiced” in the second sentence; in (a)(iii), added the provision beginning with “shall be a resident” at the end; in (b), substituted “four (4) years, except that the expiring term of a member shall continue until a successor member has been appointed” for “three (3) years with initial terms for the physical therapist members being staggered so the term of one (1) physical therapist expires each year” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; and in (c), substituted “compensation at the salary rate provided in W.S. 28-5-101(d)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00).”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (c), substituted “as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “allowance as allowed to state employees” in the first sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-25-101(a)(xii).

§ 33-25-104.
Board of physical therapy; powers and duties generally.

The board shall have the following powers and duties:

Evaluate the qualifications of applicants for licensure and certification, conduct examinations for applicants, issue license or registration certificates to those who meet the requirements established by the board;

Revoke, suspend, restrict, condition, reprimand, refuse to renew or refuse to issue the license of any physical therapist or the certificate of any physical therapy assistant or applicant pursuant to W.S.

33-25-111

;

Maintain current records listing the name of every licensed physical therapist and certified physical therapist assistant in this state, his business and home address, the date and number of his license or certification and, if known, his area or expertise, professional interest or credentials;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 134, § 3.

Adopt rules and regulations to implement this act;

Within the limitations provided in W.S. 33-25-113(a), set and from time to time revise fees as necessary to recover the expenses of administering this act;

Establish procedures for assessing the continuing professional competence of physical therapists and physical therapist assistants, including continuing education requirements that ensure that licensees’ knowledge and abilities reflect current practices and technology;

Conduct investigations, hearings and proceedings concerning alleged violations of this act and board rules and regulations;

Inspect or duplicate patient medical records which relate to any alleged acts of misconduct, documented in the form of a formal complaint filed with the board, against any license or certificate holder and as authorized by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act for regulatory bodies;

Report final disciplinary action taken against a license or certificate holder to the extent authorized or required by other state and federal laws.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 33-326.4; Laws 1985, ch. 216, § 2; 2009, ch. 134, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(i), substituted “Evaluate the qualifications of applicants for licensure and certification” for “Pass upon the qualifications of applicants for license as a physical therapist and registration as a physical therapist assistant”; in (a)(ii), deleted “Have authority to” from the beginning, substituted “restrict, condition, reprimand, refuse to renew or refuse to issue” for “or deny”, and substituted “certification” for “registration”; repealed (a)(iii)(A), which read “This list shall be published and revised each year. Copies shall be available to any person”; and added (a)(vi) through (a)(ix).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-25-101(a)(xii).

§ 33-25-105.
License and certification requirements; foreign trained applicants.

Application for licensure as a physical therapist shall be made on forms prescribed by the board, presenting to the satisfaction of the board the following:

Evidence through the application or otherwise, as the board deems desirable with due regard to the paramount interests of the public, as to the honesty, truthfulness, integrity and competency of the applicant;

Evidence of graduation from an accredited program of physical therapy or physical therapy assistant education as set forth in rules and regulations;

A personal interview if requested by the board;

If not exempted under W.S.

33-25-108

, receipt of a passing score on a physical therapy examination as set forth in board rules and regulations.

A physical therapist applicant whose application is based on a diploma issued to him by a physical therapy school outside the United States shall:

Complete the application forms and pay the application fee prescribed by rules of the board;

Furnish evidence satisfactory to the board of the completion of a physical therapy school resident course of professional instruction substantially equivalent to that required in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section. A professional education program accredited by the same accrediting agency approved by the board for programs within the United States shall be deemed substantially equivalent. In all other instances, “substantially equivalent” means a program that:

Prepares the applicant to engage in the practice of physical therapy without restriction;

Is recognized by the ministry of education of the country in which it is located.

Undergo a credentials evaluation directed by the board which determines the applicant has met the uniform criteria for educational requirements prescribed by board rules;

Complete any additional education required by the board;

Pass a board approved English proficiency examination if the applicant’s native language is not English;

If not exempted under W.S.

33-25-108

, receive a passing score on an examination approved by the board and prescribed by board rules;

Attend a personal interview if requested by the board.

An applicant for certification as a physical therapist assistant shall:

Complete the application process including payment of fees;

Submit proof of graduation from a physical therapist assistant education program accredited by a national accreditation agency approved by the board;

If not exempted under W.S.

33-25-108

, receive a passing score on an examination approved by the board and prescribed by board rules;

Meet with the board or a subcommittee of the board if requested.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 33-326.5; Laws 1985, ch. 216, § 2; 2009, ch. 134, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “licensure as a physical therapist” for “licensure or registration” in (a); in (a)(ii), substituted “graduation from an accredited” for “successful completion of a board approved” and inserted “education” following “physical therapy assistant”; rewrote (a)(iii), which read: “A personal interview may be required if the board deems it necessary”; added (a)(iv); in (b), designated the existing provisions beginning with “furnish evidence” as (b)(ii) and added (b)(i); in (b)(ii), substituted “substantially equivalent” for “equivalent” in the first sentence, deleted the former second through fourth sentences, which dealt with requirements for foreign applicants, and added the present second and third sentences; added (b)(ii)(A) and (b)(ii)(B); added (b)(iii) through (b)(vii); and added (c).

§ 33-25-106.
Examinations.

All applicants shall be required to pass an examination prior to their being licensed or certified as provided in this article unless otherwise exempted from examination pursuant to W.S.

33-25-108

. The examinations shall be approved by the board.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 134, § 3.

The physical therapist examination shall be a national examination which tests entry level competence related to physical therapy theory, examination and evaluation, diagnosis, prognosis, treatment intervention, prevention and consultation.

The physical therapy assistant examination shall test for requisite knowledge and skills in the technical application of physical therapy.

If the board determines that an applicant has engaged in or attempted to engage in conduct that subverts or undermines the integrity of the examination process, the board may disqualify the applicant from taking or retaking the examination for a specified period of time.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 33-326.6; Laws 1985, ch. 216, § 2; 2009, ch. 134, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “certified” for “registered” and substituted “in this article” for “herein”, in the second sentence, substituted “examinations” for “examination”, deleted “and administered” following “approved”, and deleted “and shall include a written examination which shall test each applicant's knowledge of basic and clinical sciences as they relate to physical therapy and physical therapy theory and physical therapy procedures along with such other subjects as the board may deem useful to test the applicant's fitness to practice physical therapy or to act as physical therapy assistant” from the end, and deleted the third sentence, which read: “The board shall define passing and failing examination grades”; repealed (b), which read: “Examinations shall be held at such times and places as the board shall determine”; repealed (c), which read: “The board may appoint persons to conduct the examinations”; repealed (d), which dealt with retaking examinations; and added (e), (f) and (g).

§ 33-25-107.
License; certificate of registration.

The board shall issue a license or certificate to each applicant who meets the requirements for licensure or certification without examination or who passes the examination and meets the standards established herein for licensure or certification.

Each individual licensed as a physical therapist in this state is authorized to use the letters “P.T.” after his name, and may represent himself to the public as a licensed physical therapist.

Each individual certified as a physical therapist assistant shall be entitled to use the letters “P.T.A.” after his name, and may represent himself to the public as a certified physical therapist assistant.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 33-326.7; Laws 1985, ch. 216, § 2; 2009, ch. 134, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), deleted “of registration” following “certificate” and substituted “certification” for “registration” in two places;
deleted “‘L.P.T.’ or” preceding “‘P.T.’” in (b); and in (c), substituted “certified” for “registered” in two places and deleted “‘L.P.T.A.’ or” preceding “‘P.T.A.’”

§ 33-25-108.
Licensure or certification by endorsement.

The board shall license as a physical therapist or certify as a physical therapist assistant without examination an applicant who:

Submits a complete application for licensure or certification by endorsement including payment of all applicable fees;

Provides verification that the applicant is licensed or registered without restriction as a physical therapist or licensed, registered or certified without restriction as a physical therapist assistant by another jurisdiction;

Demonstrates that the requirements for license, registration or certification in the other jurisdiction were, at the date of licensure or registration, substantially equal to the requirements for licensing or certification in this act;

Has not had any professional discipline and is not subject to any investigation or pending disciplinary action in any other jurisdiction;

Meets with the board or a subcommittee of the board if requested.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 33-326.8; Laws 1971, ch. 172, § 3; 1985, ch. 216, § 2; 2009, ch. 134, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, designated the existing provisions beginning with “The board shall license” as (a), designated the existing provisions beginning with “licensed or registered” as (a)(ii), and designated the existing provisions beginning with “requirements for license” as (a)(iii); in (a), inserted “as a physical therapist” following “shall license”, substituted “certify as a physical therapist assistant” for “register”, and substituted “an applicant who” for “those applicants who meet the requirements set forth in W.S. 33 25 108 and who are”; added (a)(i); in (a)(ii), added “Provides verification that the applicant is” at the beginning, added “without restriction” following “certified”, and substituted “another jurisdiction for “another state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia if the”; in (a)(iii), added “Demonstrates that the” at the beginning, substituted “other jurisdiction” for “state, territory or district”, substituted “certification in this act” for “registration set forth in this act”, and deleted the second sentence, which read: “However, if the applicant has not taken a physical therapy examination given by the professional examination service, or has failed the examination one (1) or more times, issuance of a license or registration under this section is at the discretion of the board”, and added (a)(iv) and (a)(v).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-25-101(a)(xii).

§ 33-25-109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 134, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 9, related to temporary license to practice physical therapy.

§ 33-25-110.
License or certificate expiration and reissuance.

All permanent licenses and certificates issued pursuant to this act shall expire on October 1 of the year next succeeding their issuance.

A license or certificate may be renewed by submitting a timely, sufficient and complete application, payment of the required fee and verification of continuing competence.

A license or certificate which has expired may be reissued upon submission by the applicant of a completed application, payment of fees, demonstration that the applicant meets all current requirements for licensure or certification under this act and verification of continuing competence.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 33-326.10; Laws 1971, ch. 172, § 5; 1976, ch. 14, § 1; 1985, ch. 216, § 2; 2009, ch. 134, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “of registration” following “certificate” throughout the section; designated the existing provisions beginning with “All permanent licenses” as (a), designated the existing provisions beginning with “A license or certificate may be renewed” as (b), and designated the existing provisions beginning with “A license or certificate which has expired” as (c); substituted “October 1” for “January 1” in (a); in (b), substituted “submitting a timely, sufficient and complete application” for “making application”, deleted “and upon” preceding “payment”, and added “and verification of continuing competence” at the end; and substituted “reissued upon submission by the applicant of a completed application, payment of fees, demonstration that the applicant meets all current requirements for licensure or certification under this act and verification of continuing competence” for “renewed within five (5) years of its expiration by the payment of renewal fees for each year or part thereof during which the license or registration was ineffective, and the payment of the required restoration fee. No renewal shall be permitted of a license or certificate of registration which has expired and has not been renewed for five (5) years from its expiration date, without full compliance with all requirements of this act” in (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-25-101(a)(xii).